Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.230

Legislative agencies and committees deemed part of legislative branch.

For the purposes of this chapter, the statute law committee, the joint legislative audit and review committee, the joint transportation committee, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the office of legislative support services, the joint higher education committee, the office of state actuary, and all legislative standing committees of both houses shall be deemed a part of the legislative branch of state government.

[ 2012 c 229 s 205; 2012 c 113 s 7; 2005 c 319 s 109; 1996 c 288 s 40; 1981 c 270 s 12; 1975 1st ex.s. c 293 s 11; 1965 c 8 s 43.88.230. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 23.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2012 c 113 s 7 and by 2012 c 229 s 205, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2012 c 113: See note following RCW 44.80.010.

Findings—Intent—Part headings—Effective dates—2005 c 319: See notes following RCW 43.17.020.

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 270: See notes following RCW 43.88.010.